Alabama, session 2026rs, HB299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
42 Section 1. Sections 34-27B-2, 34-27B-3, 34-27B-4,
43 34-27B-5, 34-27B-7, 34-27B-8, 34-27B-9, and 34-27B-11, Code of
44 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
45 "§34-27B-2
46 As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have
47 the following meanings:
48 (1) BOARD. The Alabama State Board of Respiratory
49 Therapy.
50 (2) DIRECT CLINICAL SUPERVISION. A situation where a
51 licensed respiratory therapist or physician is available for
52 the purpose of communication, consultation, and assistance.
53 (3) HEALTHCARE HEALTH CARE FACILITY. The definition
54 shall be the same meaning as in Section 22-21-260.
55 (4) LICENSED ADVANCED PRACTICE PROVIDER. A health care
56 professional who undergoes specialized education, training,
Page 2

professional who undergoes specialized education, training,
HB299 INTRODUCED
57 and certification to provide services such as medical
58 diagnosis and treatment. The term includes a physician
59 assistant, certified registered nurse practitioner, or
60 certified registered nurse anesthetist with prescribing
61 authority.
62 (4)(5) MEDICALLY APPROVED PROTOCOL. A detailed plan for
63 taking specific diagnostic or treatment actions, or both,
64 authorized by the treating physician of the patient, all of
65 which actions shall be which is:
66 a. In a hospital or other inpatient health care
67 facility, approved by the supervising physician of the
68 respiratory therapist or in an outpatient treatment setting
69 approved by the supervising physician of the respiratory
70 therapist.;
71 b. Except in cases of medical emergency, instituted
72 following an evaluation of the patient by a physician or
73 otherwise directed by the supervising physician of the
74 respiratory therapist.; and
75 c. Consistent with the definition of the scope of
76 practice of respiratory therapy, as established by this
77 chapter.
78 (5)(6) PHYSICIAN. A person An individual who is a
79 doctor of medicine or a doctor of osteopathy licensed to
80 practice in this state.
81 (6)(7) RESPIRATORY THERAPIST. A person An individual
82 licensed by the board to administer respiratory therapy and
83 who has the knowledge and skills necessary to administer
84 respiratory therapy, monitor patient responses, modify
Page 3

respiratory therapy, monitor patient responses, modify
HB299 INTRODUCED
85 respiratory therapy based upon patient response, provide
86 information and education to patients about deficiencies or
87 disorders of the cardiopulmonary system, and supervise others
88 in the delivery of appropriate respiratory therapy procedures.
89 (7)(8) RESPIRATORY THERAPY OR CARE. Therapy,
90 management, rehabilitation, diagnostic evaluation, and care of
91 patients with deficiencies and abnormalities of the
92 cardiopulmonary system and associated aspects of other
93 systems' functions, given by a health care professional
94 respiratory therapist under the direction of a physician or
95 licensed advanced practice provider. The term includes, but is
96 not limited to, the following activities conducted upon
97 written prescription, verbal order, or medically approved
98 protocol:
99 a. Direct and indirect pulmonary care services that are
100 safe, aseptic, preventive, or restorative to the patient.
101 b. Direct and indirect respiratory therapy services,
102 including, but not limited to, the administration of
103 pharmacologic, diagnostic, and therapeutic agents related to
104 respiratory therapy procedures necessary to implement a
105 treatment, disease prevention, pulmonary rehabilitative, or
106 diagnostic regimen prescribed by a physician or a licensed
107 advanced practice provider.
108 c. Observation and monitoring of signs and symptoms,
109 general behavior, and general physical response to respiratory
110 therapy treatment and diagnostic testing and determination of
111 whether such these signs, symptoms, reactions, behavior, or
112 general responses exhibit abnormal characteristics, and
Page 4

general responses exhibit abnormal characteristics, and
HB299 INTRODUCED
113 implementation, based on observed abnormalities, of
114 appropriate reporting or referral practices or prescribed and
115 medically approved respiratory therapy protocols or
116 appropriate changes in a treatment regimen, pursuant to a
117 prescription by a physician or a licensed advanced practice
118 provider, or the initiation of emergency procedures.
119 d. The diagnostic and therapeutic use of any of the
120 following, in accordance with the prescription of a physician
121 or a licensed advanced practice provider:
122 1. Administration of medical gases, exclusive of not
123 including general anesthesia.
124 2. Aerosols.
125 3. Humidification.
126 4. Environmental control systems and hyperbaric
127 therapy.
128 5. Pharmacologic agents related to respiratory therapy
129 procedures.
130 6. Mechanical or physiological ventilatory support.
131 7. Bronchopulmonary hygiene.
132 8. Cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
133 9. Maintenance of the natural airways.
134 10. Insertion without cutting tissues and maintenance
135 of artificial airways.
136 11. Diagnostic and testing techniques required for
137 implementation of respiratory therapy protocols.
138 12. Collections of specimens of blood and other body
139 fluids including specimens from the respiratory tract.
140 13. Collection of inspired and expired gas samples.
Page 5

13. Collection of inspired and expired gas samples.
HB299 INTRODUCED
141 14. Analysis of blood, gases, and respiratory
142 secretions.
143 15. Measurements of ventilatory volumes, pressures, and
144 flows.
145 16. Pulmonary function testing.
146 17. Hemodynamic and other related physiologic
147 measurements of the cardiopulmonary system.
148 18. Respiratory telecommunications.
149 19. Cardiopulmonary disease management.
150 20. Tobacco cessation.
151 e. The transcription and implementation of the written
152 and verbal orders of a physician or licensed advanced practice
153 provider pertaining to the practice of respiratory therapy.
154 f. Institution of known and medically approved
155 protocols relating to respiratory therapy in emergency
156 situations in the absence of immediate direction by a
157 physician or licensed advanced practice provider and
158 institution of specific procedures and diagnostic testing
159 related to respiratory therapy as ordered by a physician to
160 assist in diagnosis, monitoring, treatment, and medical
161 research.
162 g. Delivery of respiratory therapy procedures,
163 instruction, and education of patients in the proper methods
164 of self-care and prevention of cardiopulmonary diseases and
165 other conditions requiring the use of respiratory therapy
166 equipment or techniques."
167 "§34-27B-3
168 (a) Except as provided in Section 34-27B-7, no person
Page 6

(a) Except as provided in Section 34-27B-7, no person
HB299 INTRODUCED
169 individual shall hold himself or herself out to be, or
170 function as, a respiratory therapist in this state unless
171 licensed in accordance with this chapter.
172 (b) In order to obtain a respiratory therapist license,
173 an applicant shall demonstrate to the board that he or she:
174 (i) is a citizen of the United States or, if not a citizen of
175 the United States, a person an individual who is legally
176 present in the United States with appropriate documentation
177 from the federal government,; (ii) is at least 18 years of
178 age,; (iii) is a high school graduate, or has the equivalent
179 of a high school diploma,; (iv) demonstrates good moral
180 character; and (v) meets one of the following requirements:
181 (1) Holds and maintains credentials as a registered
182 respiratory therapist (RRT) or a certified respiratory
183 therapist (CRT), as granted by the National Board for
184 Respiratory Care or its successor organization.
185 (2) Holds a temporary license issued under subsection
186 (d) of Section 34-27B-7 and passes the examination leading to
187 the CRT or RRT credential.
188 (3) Has a valid respiratory therapist license from
189 another state, the District of Columbia, or a territory of the
190 United States, whose requirements for licensure are considered
191 by the board as substantially similar to those of Alabama this
192 state and who otherwise meets the reciprocity requirements
193 established by the board.
194 (4) Meets the requirements of subdivision (2) of
195 subsection (d) of Section 34-27B-7.
196 (5)(4) Has been approved by the board as otherwise
Page 7

(5)(4) Has been approved by the board as otherwise
HB299 INTRODUCED
197 qualified by special training and has passed the licensure
198 examination established by the board in subsection (c).
199 (c) The board shall arrange for the administration of a
200 licensure examination administered by the state or a national
201 agency approved by the board. The examination shall be
202 validated and nationally recognized as testing respiratory
203 care competencies. The board may enter into agreements or
204 contracts, consistent with state law, with outside
205 organizations for the purpose of developing, administering,
206 grading, and reporting the results of licensure examinations.
207 Such These organizations shall be capable of meeting the
208 standards of the National Commission for Health Certifying
209 Agencies, or its equivalent or successor organization. The
210 board shall establish criteria for satisfactory performance on
211 the examination.
212 (d) The board may request a criminal history background
213 check of an applicant for the purpose of determining an
214 applicant's suitability for a license to practice respiratory
215 therapy. If requested by the board, the applicant shall submit
216 a full set of fingerprints to the board for the purpose of
217 obtaining a state and national criminal history background
218 check.
219 (2) Fingerprints obtained pursuant to subdivision (1)
220 may be exchanged by the board, the Alabama State Law
221 Enforcement Agency, or any successor entity thereof, or any
222 channeler approved by the board, with the Federal Bureau of
223 Investigation for the purpose of obtaining a state and
224 national criminal history background check.
Page 8

national criminal history background check.
HB299 INTRODUCED
225 (3) The applicant shall be responsible for all costs
226 associated with the submission of his or her fingerprints and
227 obtaining a state and national criminal history background
228 check. The board may incorporate those costs into the cost of
229 licensing or may charge the applicant a separate fee, which
230 may be payable to the board, the Alabama State Law Enforcement
231 Agency, or any successor entity thereof, or the approved
232 channeler, as appropriate.
233 (4) Information received by the board pursuant to a
234 state and national criminal history background check shall be
235 confidential and shall not be a public record, except that any
236 information received by and relied upon by the board in
237 denying the issuance of a license may be disclosed as
238 necessary to support the denial."
239 "§34-27B-4
240 (a) The board shall perform all of the following
241 functions:
242 (1) Set respiratory therapy licensure fees, including,
243 but not limited to, application, initial, renewal, and
244 reinstatement fees.
245 (2) Establish and publish minimum standards of
246 continuing education of respiratory therapy in accordance with
247 those standards developed and accepted by the profession.
248 (3) Examine for, approve, deny, revoke, suspend, and
249 renew licensure of duly qualified applicants.
250 (4) Promulgate Adopt and publish rules in accordance
251 with the Administrative Procedure Act to administer this
252 chapter.
Page 9

chapter.
HB299 INTRODUCED
253 (5) Conduct hearings on charges calling for the denial,
254 suspension, revocation, or refusal to renew a license.
255 (6) Maintain an up-to-date list of every person
256 individual licensed to practice respiratory therapy pursuant
257 to this chapter. The list shall include the last known place
258 of residence and the state license number of the licensee.
259 (7) Maintain an up-to-date list of persons individuals
260 whose licenses have been suspended, revoked, or denied. The
261 list shall include the name, Social Security number, type,
262 date, and cause of action, penalty incurred, and the length of
263 the penalty. The information on the list, except for Social
264 Security numbers, shall be available for public inspection
265 during reasonable business hours and the information may be
266 shared with others as deemed necessary and acceptable by the
267 board.
268 (b) The board, by rule, shall prorate fees as
269 appropriate and shall provide applicants and licensees with
270 verification of receipt of fees."
271 "§34-27B-5
272 (a)(1) The Alabama State Board of Respiratory Therapy
273 is created to implement and administer this chapter and shall
274 be composed of six seven members appointed by the Governor.
275 Three Four of the members shall be respiratory therapists, one
276 member shall be the chief executive officer of a hospital, one
277 member shall be a physician, and one member shall be a
278 consumer.
279 (2) The respiratory therapist members of the board
280 appointed by the Governor shall be selected from a list of
Page 10

appointed by the Governor shall be selected from a list of
HB299 INTRODUCED
281 names submitted by the Alabama Society for Respiratory Care.
282 The list shall include two names for each appointed position
283 to be filled. The respiratory therapist members appointed to
284 the board shall be registered or certified by the National
285 Board for Respiratory Care or its successor organization.
286 Respiratory therapists appointed to the initial board must be
287 eligible to obtain a license under this chapter. Respiratory
288 therapists selected for subsequent appointments must and be
289 licensed by the state board.
290 (3) The hospital member shall be selected from a list
291 of two names submitted by the Alabama Hospital Association.
292 (4) The physician member appointed shall be duly
293 licensed to practice medicine in Alabama and shall be a member
294 of at least one of the following: The American Thoracic
295 Society, the American College of Chest Physicians, the
296 American Society of Anesthesiologists, or the American Academy
297 of Pediatrics. The physician member of the board appointed by
298 the Governor shall be selected from a list of two names
299 submitted by the Medical Association of the State of Alabama.
300 (5) The consumer member appointed by the Governor shall
301 be selected from one of the names submitted by the American
302 Lung Association in Alabama, the Alabama Chapter of the Cystic
303 Fibrosis Foundation, and the Alabama Asthma Coalition. Each
304 entity shall submit one name for consideration.
305 (b) All board members shall be residents of Alabama and
306 all appointing authorities shall coordinate their appointments
307 so that diversity of gender, race, and geographical areas is
308 reflective of the makeup to assure the board's membership is
Page 11

reflective of the makeup to assure the board's membership is
HB299 INTRODUCED
309 inclusive and reflects the racial, gender, geographic, urban,
310 rural, and economic diversity of this state.
311 (c) The Governor shall make the appointments for all
312 positions for members of the board within 90 days of the date
313 the position becomes available, including initial
314 appointments, vacancies, and replacements at the end of the
315 term of service. All members shall continue to serve until a
316 successor is appointed.
317 (d) Members of the board shall have the same immunities
318 from personal liability as state employees for actions taken
319 in the performance of their official duties.
320 (e) The term of office of those members first appointed
321 shall be as follows: Two respiratory therapists and the
322 hospital member, as determined by the Governor, shall serve
323 for terms of two years, and one respiratory therapist and the
324 physician member shall serve for terms of four years. The
325 additional respiratory therapist member appointed after
326 October 1, 2026, shall serve an initial term of not more than
327 four years as determined by the Governor. Thereafter, the term
328 of all members, including the consumer member, shall be for
329 four years. No member shall be appointed for more than three
330 consecutive full terms. A vacancy in an unexpired term shall
331 be filled in the manner of the original appointment. The board
332 shall elect a chair and vice chair annually.
333 (f) The board shall meet at least twice each year at a
334 time and place determined by the chair. A majority of the
335 members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the
Page 12

members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the
HB299 INTRODUCED
336 transaction of business.
337 (g) Each member shall serve without compensation, but
338 shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in attendance
339 at meetings of the board and any other expenses incurred on
340 business of the board at its discretion. Board members shall
341 also receive a per diem allowance following the guidelines for
342 state employees. The reimbursement for expenses and per diem
343 shall be paid from funds derived from the Alabama State Board
344 of Respiratory Therapy Fund."
345 "§34-27B-7
346 (a) The board shall issue a respiratory therapist
347 license to any person individual who meets the qualifications
348 required by this chapter and who pays the license fee
349 established herein.
350 (b) Any person individual who is issued a regular or
351 temporary respiratory therapy license as a respiratory
352 therapist under this chapter may use the words "licensed
353 respiratory therapist" or the letters "L.R.T." in connection
354 with his or her name to denote his or her license.
355 (c) A license issued under this chapter shall be
356 subject to biennial renewal every two years.
357 (d)(1) The board may issue a six-month temporary
358 license as a respiratory therapist to persons individuals who
359 have graduated from a respiratory therapy educational program
360 accredited by the Council on Allied Health Education Programs
361 (CAHEP) in collaboration with the Committee on Accreditation
362 for Respiratory Care (CoARC), or their successor
363 organizations, and who have applied for and are awaiting
Page 13

organizations, and who have applied for and are awaiting
HB299 INTRODUCED
364 competency examination. The temporary license shall be
365 renewable only once for an additional six-month period if the
366 applicant fails the examination. Exceptions may be made at the
367 discretion of the board based upon an appeal identifying
368 extenuating circumstances. The holder of a temporary license
369 may only provide respiratory therapy or care activities,
370 services, and procedures as defined in Section 34-27B-2 under
371 the direct clinical supervision of a licensed onsite
372 respiratory therapist or physician.
373 (2) The board shall grant a license as a respiratory
374 therapist to other persons who do not meet the qualifications
375 for licensure pursuant to Section 34-27B-3, but who, on the
376 effective date of the adoption of the rules and regulations of
377 the board, are currently employed in the administration of
378 respiratory therapy under the direction of a physician in the
379 State of Alabama. The opportunity to apply for a respiratory
380 therapy license issued under this subdivision shall expire 365
381 days after implementation of the rules of the board. Holders
382 of these licenses shall be eligible to renew their licenses as
383 are any other licensed respiratory therapists under this
384 chapter."
385 "§34-27B-8
386 (a) The board may refuse to renew a license, may
387 suspend or revoke a license, may impose probationary
388 conditions, or may impose an administrative fine not to exceed
389 five hundred dollars ($500) per violation, as disciplinary
390 actions if a licensee or applicant for licensure has been
391 found guilty of unprofessional conduct that has endangered, or
Page 14

found guilty of unprofessional conduct that has endangered, or
HB299 INTRODUCED
392 is likely to endanger, the health, welfare, or safety of the
393 public. Unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited
394 to, each of the following:
395 (1) Obtaining a license by means of fraud,
396 misrepresentation, or concealment of material facts.
397 (2) Being found guilty of unprofessional conduct as
398 defined by the rules established by the board, or violating
399 the code of ethics adopted and published by the American
400 Association for Respiratory Care or its successor
401 organization.
402 (3) Conviction of a crime, other than a minor offense,
403 in any court if the offense has a direct bearing on whether
404 the person should be entrusted to serve the public in the
405 capacity of a respiratory therapist.
406 (b) The board, after a hearing, may exercise the
407 disciplinary actions authorized in subsection (a). The board
408 shall adopt policies for the conduct of the hearings. One year
409 after the date of the revocation of a license, application may
410 be made to the board for reinstatement. The board shall hold a
411 hearing to consider any application for reinstatement.
412 (c) The board may establish adopt rules regarding the
413 disciplinary actions authorized in subsection (a) in
414 accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
415 (d) A suspended license is subject to expiration during
416 the suspension period.
417 (e) The board may subpoena any person or document and
418 take testimony to carry out this chapter.
419 (f) The board shall promote the early identification,
Page 15

(f) The board shall promote the early identification,
HB299 INTRODUCED
420 intervention, treatment, and rehabilitation of respiratory
421 therapy licensees who may be impaired by reason of illness,
422 inebriation, excessive use of drugs, narcotics, alcohol,
423 chemicals, or other substances, or as a result of any physical
424 or mental condition. If the board has reasonable cause to
425 believe that a respiratory therapy licensee is impaired, the
426 board may refer that licensee to a treatment program."
427 "§34-27B-9
428 (a) A person An individual who does not hold a license
429 or a temporary license as a respiratory therapist or whose
430 license or temporary license has been suspended or revoked may
431 not do any of the following:
432 (1) Use in connection with the person's individual's
433 practice the words "respiratory care professional,"
434 "respiratory therapist," "respiratory care practitioner,"
435 "certified respiratory care practitioner," "licensed
436 respiratory therapist," "inhalation therapist," or
437 "respiratory therapy technician"; or use the letters "R.C.P."
438 or "L.R.T."; or use any other words, letters, abbreviations,
439 or insignia indicating or implying that the person individual
440 is a respiratory therapist.
441 (2) Directly or by implication represent in any way
442 that the person individual is a respiratory therapist.
443 (b) A person who holds a license or a temporary license
444 to practice respiratory therapy under this chapter may use the
445 title "respiratory therapist" and the abbreviation "L.R.T."
446 "§34-27B-11
447 Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as
Page 16

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as
HB299 INTRODUCED
448 preventing or restricting the practice, services, or
449 activities of any of the following:
450 (1) Any person individual who is licensed in Alabama
451 this state or certified by an organization accredited by the
452 National Commission for Certifying Agencies and acceptable to
453 the state from engaging in the profession or occupation for
454 which the person individual is licensed or certified.
455 (2) Any person individual employed by the United States
456 government who provides respiratory therapy solely under the
457 direction or control of the United States government agency or
458 organization.
459 (3) Any person individual receiving clinical training
460 while pursuing a course of study leading to registry or
461 certification in a respiratory therapy educational program
462 accredited by the Council on Allied Health Education Programs
463 in collaboration with the Committee on Accreditation for
464 Respiratory Care or their successor organizations. This person
465 will individual shall be under direct supervision and be
466 designated by a title clearly indicating his or her status as
467 a student or trainee.
468 (4) Any emergency medical technician licensed by the
469 Alabama State Board Department of Public Health who is
470 providing care to a patient at the scene of an emergency, or
471 during transport of the patient in a licensed ground
472 ambulance, provided that such care may not exceed the scope of
473 care permissible under the rules of the Alabama State Board
474 Department of Public Health.
475 (5) The delivery of respiratory therapy of sick or
Page 17

(5) The delivery of respiratory therapy of sick or
HB299 INTRODUCED
476 disabled persons individuals by family members or domestic
477 servants or the care of non-institutionalized persons
478 noninstitutionalized individuals by a surrogate family member
479 as long as the persons individuals do not represent themselves
480 as, or hold themselves out to be, respiratory therapists.
481 (6) Any individual who has demonstrated competency in
482 one or more areas covered by this chapter as long as the
483 individual performs only those functions that he or she is
484 qualified by examination to perform. The standards of the
485 National Commission for Certifying Agencies, or its
486 equivalent, shall serve as a standard with which to evaluate
487 those examinations and examining organizations.
488 (7) Any person individual performing respiratory
489 services or care not licensed as a respiratory therapist in
490 accordance with this chapter who is employed in a diagnostic
491 laboratory, physician's office, clinic, or outpatient
492 treatment facility and whose function is to administer
493 treatment or perform diagnostic procedures confined to that
494 laboratory, office, clinic, or outpatient facility under the
495 direction of a licensed physician.
496 (8) Any respiratory therapy student who performs
497 limited respiratory therapy procedures as an employee of any a
498 health care provider organization while enrolled in a
499 respiratory therapy educational program accredited by the
500 Council on Allied Health Education Programs in collaboration
501 with the Committee on Accreditation for Respiratory Care or
502 their successor organizations, provided any procedure
503 performed by a respiratory therapy student is a procedure that
Page 18

performed by a respiratory therapy student is a procedure that
HB299 INTRODUCED
504 the student has previously studied and completed in clinical
505 training. The employee shall be designated by title as a
506 student or trainee and shall work under direct supervision of
507 a licensed respiratory therapist. The board shall maintain a
508 list of all such students.
509 (9) Any individual employed by a durable medical
510 equipment or home medical equipment company who delivers, sets
511 up, or maintains respiratory equipment, but not including
512 assessment, treatment, or evaluation of the patient.
513 (10) Any individual employed as a polysommagraphic
514 technologist working in a sleep center or diagnostic sleep
515 clinic.
516 (11) Any licensed respiratory therapist performing
517 advances in the art and techniques of respiratory therapy
518 learned through special training acceptable to the board."
519 Section 2. Section 34-27B-8.1 is added to the Code of
520 Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
521 An individual shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor
522 if he or she does any of the following:
523 (1) Sells or fraudulently obtains or furnishes, or aids
524 or abets in selling or fraudulently obtaining, any license
525 issued pursuant to this chapter.
526 (2) Practices respiratory therapy, uses the title
527 respiratory therapist, or uses in connection with his or her
528 name any designation tending to imply that he or she is a
529 respiratory therapist without a valid and active license
530 issued pursuant to this chapter.
531 Section 3. Section 34-27B-12, Code of Alabama 1975,
Page 19

Section 3. Section 34-27B-12, Code of Alabama 1975,
HB299 INTRODUCED
532 requiring the Alabama State Board of Respiratory Therapy to
533 provide notice of regulations to respiratory therapists
534 practicing on May 17, 2004, is repealed.
535 Section 4. This act shall become effective on October
536 1, 2026.
537
Page 20